Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-123
Precinct, township, or school district bonds; duty of local boards.

Precinct, township, or school district boards or officers shall file for record with the county clerk the question submitted, the notice and proof of publication, and the return of votes for and against all bonds issued by such precinct, township, or school district.

G.S.1873, c. 63, § 1, p. 883;

R.S.1913, § 388;

C.S.1922, § 305;

C.S.1929, § 11-124;

R.S.1943, § 10-123;

Laws 1990, LB 924, § 2.

Certificate of registration on back of bonds is evidence of corporate existence of school district. State ex rel. Hopkins v. School Dist. No. 7, of Sherman County, 21 Neb. 725, 33 N.W. 266 (1887).

Act of 1875, amending this section and relating to levy of taxes, was invalid because it contained more than one subject and was broader than the title. B. & M. R. R. Co. v. Board of County Comrs. of Saunders County, 9 Neb. 507, 4 N.W. 240 (1880).

Power to borrow money to erect schoolhouse did not authorize issuance of negotiable bonds. Ashuelot Nat. Bank of Keene v. School Dist. No. 7, of Valley County, 56 F. 197 (8th Cir. 1893).